Mississippi, session 2026, SB2504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) Study committee established.  There is hereby created the Study Committee on Mathematical Literacy for the purpose of examining, evaluating and developing recommendations regarding methods for improving the math skills of Kindergarten and First- through Third-Grade students enrolled in the public schools so that every student completing the Third Grade is able to read at or above grade level.  The committee shall, at a minimum: (a)  Study the required standardized curriculum for math instruction; (b)  Study the Literacy-Based Promotion Act, Section 37-177-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, and determine which provisions of the act may be employed in the context of math education for the purposes of improving student mathematical literacy; (c)  Assess the financial cost of expanding the State Department of Education's program using data coaches, pursuant to Section 37-177-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, into the context of math literacy; and (d)  Develop recommendations for legislative or administrative reforms to be implemented in the next legislative session. (2)  Composition of the committee.  (a)  The committee shall be composed of the following eleven (11) members: (i)  The State Superintendent of Education, or his/her designee; (ii)  Three (3) senators appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (iii)  Three (3) representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (iv)  The Chair and Vice-Chair of the Senate Education Committee, or their designees; and (v)  The Chair and Vice-Chair of the House Education Committee, or their designees. (b)  Appointments to the committee shall be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act. (3)  Committee organization and responsibilities.  (a)  At its first meeting, the committee shall: (i)  Elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among its members; and (ii)  Establish rules for transacting business and keeping records. (b)  The committee shall meet as necessary and report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature no later than December 1, 2026. (c)  A majority of committee members shall constitute a quorum for conducting business. (4)  Support and cooperation.  (a)  The State Department of Education shall provide necessary staff and administrative support to the committee. (b)  In addition, the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) may provide additional staff and administrative support to the committee upon request and subject to available resources. (c)  To achieve its objectives, the committee may request data, analysis and assistance from any state agency, division or political subdivision. (5) Compensation of committee members.  (a)  Legislative members of the study committee shall be entitled to per diem and reimbursement of expenses in accordance with Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. (b)  Nonlegislative members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses from any available funds designated for such purposes. (6)  Dissolution of the committee.  The committee shall be dissolved on January 1, 2027, or upon the submission of its final report, whichever is earlier. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.